fi: Valopalkin linssin materiaali: Akryyli (PMMA); Lasi; Polykarbonaatti; Muu
ro-RO: Materialul lentilei barei de lumini: Acril (PMMA); Sticlă; Policarbonat; Altele
fr: Matériau d'objectif de barre lumineuse: Acrylique (PMMA); Verre; Polycarbonate; Autre
sl-SI: Material leče svetlobnega bloka: Akril (PMMA); Steklo; Polikarbonat; Drugo
bg-BG: Материал на лещата на LED бара: Акрил (PMMA); Стъкло; Поликарбонат; Друг
hu: Fényhíd lencse anyaga: Akril (PMMA); Üveg; Polikarbonát; Egyéb
hr-HR: Materijal leće svjetlosne trake: Akril (PMMA); Staklo; Polikarbonat; Ostalo
pt-BR: Material da lente da barra de luz: Acrílico (PMMA); Vidro; Policarbonato; Outro
pt-PT: Material da lente da barra de luz: Acrílico (PMMA); Vidro; Policarbonato; Outro
da: Lygtebjælkens linsemateriale: Akryl (PMMA); Glas; Polykarbonat; Andet
nl: Lensmateriaal lichtbalk: Acryl (PMMA); Glas; Polycarbonaat; Overige
es: Material de la lente de la barra de luces: Acrílico (PMMA); Vidrio; Policarbonato; Otro
cs: Materiál čoček světelné lišty: Akryl (PMMA); Sklo; Polykarbonát; Jiné
ja: ライトバーレンズ素材: アクリル (PMMA); ガラス; ポリカーボネート; その他
tr: LED bar lens malzemesi: Akrilik (PMMA); Cam; Polikarbonat; Diğer
nb: Linsemateriale i lysplanke: Akryl (PMMA); Glass; Polykarbonat; Annet
de: Linsenmaterial des Lightbars: Acryl (PMMA); Glas; Polycarbonat; Sonstige
en: Light bar lens material: Acrylic (PMMA); Glass; Polycarbonate; Other
ko: 라이트 바 렌즈 소재: 아크릴(PMMA); 유리; 폴리카보네이트; 기타
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำเลนส์ของไลท์บาร์: อะคริลิก (PMMA); กระจก; โพลิคาร์บอเนต; อื่นๆ
vi: Chất liệu thấu kính của thanh đèn LED: Acrylic (PMMA); Kính; Polycarbonate; Khác
ru: Материал линзы световой балки: Акрил (PMMA); Стекло; Поликарбонат; Другое
el: Υλικό φακού light bar: Ακρυλικό (PMMA); Γυαλί; Πολυκαρβονικό; Άλλο
zh-TW: 燈條鏡片材質: 壓克力 (PMMA); 玻璃; 聚碳酸酯; 其他
sk-SK: Materiál šošoviek svetelnej lišty: Akryl (PMMA); Sklo; Polykarbonát; Iné
lt-LT: Šviesos juostos lęšio medžiaga: Akrilas (PMMA); Stiklas; Polikarbonatas; Kita
it: Materiale della lente della barra luminosa: Acrilico (PMMA); Vetro; Policarbonato; Altro
sv: Ljusstånglinsens material: Akryl (PMMA); Glas; Polykarbonat; Övrigt
zh-CN: 灯条透镜材质: 亚克力 (PMMA); 玻璃; 聚碳酸酯; 其他
pl: Materiał pokrywy listwy świetlnej: Akryl (PMMA); Szkło; Poliwęglan; Inne